Oklahoma, session 2025, SB932.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 205 of Title 75A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this act:


1. “Algorithmically curated” means social media platform user


engagement is primarily driven by a curation algorithm and


engagement driven design elements;


2. “Curation algorithm” means a computational process or set of


rules used by a social media platform that determines, influences,



Req. No. 825 Page 1


or personalizes output that is designed to encourage prolonged or


frequent engagement;


3. “Engagement driven design elements” means autoplay features


that continuously play content without requiring user interaction,


scroll or pagination that loads additional content as long as the


user continues to scroll, or push notifications;


4. “Excessive use” means the use of a social media platform by


a minor to an extent that the use substantially interferes with the


minor’s normal functioning in academic performance, sleep, in-person


relationships, mental health, or physical health;


5. “Minor” means an individual under eighteen (18) years of


age;


6. “Push notification” means an automatic electronic message


displayed on a user’s device, when the user interface for the social


media platform is not actively open or visible on the device, that


prompts the user to check or engage with the social media platform;


7. “Social media platform” means a website or internet medium


that:


a. permits a person to become a registered user,


establish an account, or create a profile for the


purpose of allowing users to create, share, and view


user-generated content through such an account or


profile,



Req. No. 825 Page 2


b. enables one or more users to generate content that can


be viewed by other users of the medium, and


c. primarily serves as a medium for users to interact


with content generated by other users of the medium;


and


8. “User” means a person who accesses or uses a social media


platform.


B. 1. A minor user who is a resident of this state or his or


her parent or legal guardian may bring a cause of action against a


social media platform in court for an adverse mental health outcome


arising, in whole or in part, from the minor’s excessive use of the


social media platform’s algorithmically curated service.


2. To recover damages in a cause of action brought pursuant to


this subsection, a person that brings the cause of action must


demonstrate:


a. that the minor user has been diagnosed by a licensed


mental health care provider with an adverse mental


health outcome, and


b. that the adverse mental health outcome was caused by


the minor user’s excessive use of an algorithmically


curated social media platform.


3. Except as provided in paragraph 4 of this subsection, a


person who brings an action pursuant to this subsection is entitled


to a rebuttable presumption that:

Req. No. 825 Page 3


a. the minor user’s adverse mental health outcome was


caused, in whole or in part, by the minor user’s


excessive use of the algorithmically curated social


media service, and


b. the minor user’s excessive use of the algorithmically


curated social media platform was caused, in whole or


in part, by the algorithmically curated social media


platform’s curation algorithm and engagement driven


design elements.


4. A social media company that complies with the provisions of


subsection C of this section is entitled to a rebuttable presumption


that:


a. the minor user’s adverse mental health outcome was not


caused, in whole or in part, by the minor user’s


excessive use of the algorithmically curated social


media platform, and


b. the minor user’s excessive use of the algorithmically


curated social media platform was not caused, in whole


or in part, by the algorithmically curated social


media platform’s curation algorithm and engagement


driven design elements.


5. If a court or fact finder finds that minor user of this


state suffered any adverse mental health outcome as a result of the



Req. No. 825 Page 4


minor’s use of a social media platform’s algorithmically curated


service, the person seeking relief is entitled to:


a. an award of reasonable attorney fees and court costs,


and


b. an amount equal to the greater of:


(1) Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for each


adverse mental health outcome incidence, or


(2) the amount of actual damages.


6. A social media platform shall not be held liable based on


the content of material posted by users of the algorithmically


curated social media platform or for declining to restrict access to


or modify user posts based solely on the content of such posts.


7. Nothing in this subsection shall displace any other


available remedies or rights authorized by state or federal law.


C. 1. A person is not entitled to the rebuttable presumption


described in paragraph 3 of subsection B of this section and a


social media platform is entitled to the rebuttable presumption


described in paragraph 4 of subsection B of this section, if the


social media platform demonstrates to the court that the social


media platform:


a. limits a minor user who is a resident of this state’s


use of the algorithmically curated social media


platform to no more than three hours in a twenty-four-


hour period across all devices,

Req. No. 825 Page 5


b. restricts a minor user who is a resident of this state


from accessing the algorithmically curated social


media platform between the hours of 10:30 p.m. and


6:30 a.m.,


c. requires the parent or legal guardian of the minor who


is a resident of this state to consent to a minor


user’s use of the algorithmically curated social media


platform, and


d. disables engagement driven design elements for a minor


user’s account.


2. A social media platform may utilize settings that are


enabled at the device level to impose the requirements described in


this subsection; provided, however, a social media platform remains


liable to ensure that the minor user’s account is subject to the


restrictions pursuant to this subsection.


D. A waiver or limitation, or a purported waiver or limitation,


of any of the following is void and unlawful, is against public


policy, and a court or arbitrator may not enforce or give effect to


the waiver, notwithstanding any contract or choice-of-law provision


in a contract:


1. A protection or requirement provided pursuant to this


section;


2. The right to cooperate with or file a complaint with a


government agency;

Req. No. 825 Page 6


3. The right to a private right of action as provided pursuant


to subsection B of this section; or


4. The right to recover actual damages, statutory damages,


civil penalties, costs, or fees as authorized pursuant to this


section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-825 CN 1/19/2025 5:46:15 AM

































Req. No. 825 Page 7